Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Endangered and Threatened Plants

146.600.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that it is the policy of the Commonwealth to recognize endangered and threatened species of plants for human enjoyment, for scientific purposes, and to ensure their perpetuation as viable components of their ecosystems for the benefit of the people of Kentucky. It is the policy of the General Assembly that all plants covered by KRS 146.600 to 146.619 are property of the landowner, and that KRS 146.600 to 146.619 shall not impede the development or use of public or private lands.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 164, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

146.605.
Definitions for KRS 146.600 to 146.619.

As used in KRS 146.600 to 146.619:

“Office” means the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves, created by KRS 146.430;

“Endangered species” means any species of plant that is in danger of extirpation throughout all or a significant portion of its range within the Commonwealth, or any plant species determined to be an “endangered species” pursuant to the Endangered Species Act;

“Endangered Species Act” means the Endangered Species Act of 1973, Public Law 93-205 (87 Stat. 884), as amended;

“Plant” means any member of the plant kingdom, including seeds, roots, and other parts thereof;

“Species” includes any species, subspecies, or variety of plant;

“Threatened species” means any species of plant likely to become an endangered species within the foreseeable future throughout all or a significant portion of its range within the state, or any species of plant determined to be a “threatened species” pursuant to the Endangered Species Act; and

“Cabinet” means the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 164, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2018 ch. 29, § 45, effective July 14, 2018.

146.610.
Duties of Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves — Authority for administrative regulations — Criteria for designation of plants as endangered or threatened — Plant lists — Quadrennial report.

The office may conduct investigations, with the permission of the landowner, on any species of plants indigenous to the Commonwealth necessary to develop information relating to population, distribution, habitat needs, limiting factors, and other biological and ecological data, and to determine protective measures and requirements necessary for its survival.

Any plant species identified as endangered or threatened by the Endangered Species Act shall be automatically and immediately considered in a similar category under KRS 146.600 to 146.619. The office may promulgate administrative regulations, upon recommendation of the office, identifying any other species of plant within the state as an endangered or threatened species as a result of any one (1) of the following factors:
(2) (a)

Any plant species identified as endangered or threatened by the Endangered Species Act shall be automatically and immediately considered in a similar category under KRS 146.600 to 146.619. The office may promulgate administrative regulations, upon recommendation of the office, identifying any other species of plant within the state as an endangered or threatened species as a result of any one (1) of the following factors:

The present or threatened destruction, modification, or curtailment of its habitat or range;

Overutilization for commercial, recreational, scientific, educational, or private purposes;

Disease, predation, or vandalism;

The inadequacy of existing regulatory mechanisms affecting the continued existence within the state; or

Other factors affecting its continued existence within the state.

The cabinet may, upon recommendation of the office, promulgate administrative regulations setting forth criteria for identifying and designating species of plants native to Kentucky which are in danger of extirpation within the Commonwealth or threatened with becoming endangered in the Commonwealth. The cabinet may, upon recommendation of the office, promulgate administrative regulations that identify species that it determines to be endangered or threatened. These lists shall identify the common and scientific names of each species. The lists shall include all plant species native to Kentucky which are listed as endangered or threatened on the “United States List of Endangered and Threatened Plants” pursuant to the Endangered Species Act of 1973, 87 Stat. 884, 16 U.S.C. secs. 1531-1543, as amended. The lists may also include species listed in the appendices of the “Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species,” signed March 3, 1973, as Ex. Doc. H, 93rd Congress, 1st Session. Further, the office may provide for public education purposes lists of plant species which may become threatened in the future through habitat loss, commercial exploitation, or other means, or which are presumed to be extirpated within the Commonwealth. All lists shall be updated at least every four (4) years.

Locational and population health information relating to endangered or threatened and other plant species shall be kept in the office’s natural heritage database. Information to be considered when adopting, amending, or rescinding endangered or threatened plant species lists as required in this section shall be recorded in the natural heritage database prior to use in determining the status of a plant species.

The office shall present to the Governor and the General Assembly a report on or before October 1 every four (4) years on the conditions and needs of the Commonwealth’s endangered or threatened plant species.

In carrying out programs authorized by KRS 146.600 to 146.619, the office may enter into agreements or contracts with federal agencies, other states, agencies or political subdivisions of the Commonwealth, or with individuals or private organizations for administration and management of any program established under KRS 146.600 to 146.619 or utilized for the protection of endangered or threatened plant species.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 164, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2018 ch. 29, § 46, effective July 14, 2018.

146.615.
Lists not to impede development or use of public or private lands.

The lists promulgated under KRS 146.610 shall not serve to impede the development or use of public or private lands, including, but not limited to, the normal and accepted operations of agriculture; forestry; mining; development, construction, and maintenance of oil and gas resources and appurtenances; development, construction, and maintenance of utility facilities and appurtenances; construction and maintenance of pipeline rights-of-way; construction activities; equine activities; transportation; or development activities.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 164, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

146.619.
Short title for KRS 146.600 to 146.619.

KRS 146.600 to 146.619 may be cited as the “Kentucky Rare Plant Recognition Act.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 164, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.